Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202655-182
Nebraska National Guard; rights.

The rights of a member of the Nebraska National Guard in the State of Nebraska shall include, but not be limited to, the right to:

(1) Seek employment with state, county, and local government;

(2) Not have membership in the Nebraska National Guard impact such member's right to donate to political parties when not on duty status;

(3) Participate with state, county, or local government in a law enforcement function as prescribed by that government;

(4) Receive the same protections a law enforcement officer is afforded under section 23-3211 if the member is acting as a law enforcement officer pursuant to subdivision (3) of this section; and

(5) Protection of such member's personal information as afforded personnel of public bodies pursuant to subdivision (8) of section 84-712.05, if the member is acting as a law enforcement officer pursuant to subdivision (3) of this section.

Laws 2019, LB152, § 1;

Laws 2022, LB1246, § 3.